New York, session 2025-2026, A9517.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 3 of section 3.16 of the parks, recre- 2 ation and historic preservation law, as added by a chapter of the laws 3 of 2025 amending the parks, recreation and historic preservation law 4 relating to mandating the development and approval of operational safety 5 plans, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 7680-A and A. 6634-A, 6 are amended to read as follows: 7 1. The office shall develop and approve operational safety plans prior 8 to the deployment of any employee in hazardous conditions. The plan 9 shall include, but not be limited to, a comprehensive risk assessment 10 identifying potential hazards associated with the deployment, mitigation 11 measures to address identified risks, detailed information on team 12 composition including roles and responsibilities, identification of an 13 on-site authorized person responsible for overseeing operations, a clear 14 chain of command for decision-making during the deployment, emergency 15 contact information for all team members, and [evacuation procedures 16 tailored to the specific deployment scenario], to the extent applicable, 17 evacuation procedures. The plan shall require that any employee check 18 in with the incident commander or safety officer for incident specific 19 procedures prior to taking any action at the incident location. The 20 commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall review and approve all 21 operational safety plans to ensure compliance with established safety 22 standards, verify that the employees being deployed are adequately EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10348-04-6 A. 9517 2 1 trained for their roles, and confirm that the operation is essential 2 under hazardous conditions. 3 3. When deployment occurs in coordination with one or more other enti- 4 ties, and the office is not the lead response agency, the office shall 5 make reasonable efforts to ensure that employees are provided with the 6 [information described in subdivision one of this section, to the extent 7 practicable] incident specific operational safety plan developed by the 8 lead agency and/or incident commander. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 10 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the parks, recreation 11 and historic preservation law relating to mandating the development and 12 approval of operational safety plans, as proposed in legislative bills 13 numbers S. 7680-A and A. 6634-A, takes effect.